Maryland, session 2026, SB0354.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Business Regulation
6–402.
(a) A registration statement shall be on the form that the Secretary of State
provides.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, the registration statement
shall contain or be accompanied by:
(7) (i) an audit by an independent certified public accountant if the
gross income from charitable contributions in the most recently completed fiscal year is at
least [$750,000] $1,000,000; or
(ii) a review by an independent certified public accountant if the
gross income from charitable contributions in the most recently completed fiscal year is at
least [$300,000] $500,000 $400,000 but less than [$750,000] $1,000,000;
(c) The Secretary of State may accept other documentation in place of any item
required under subsection (b) of this section, including, in place of the audit or review
required by subsection (b)(7) of this section, supporting documents indicating, and an
affidavit attesting, that:
(1) the charitable organization:
(v) has cash receipts from charitable contributions not exceeding
[$300,000] $500,000 $400,000 and amounting to 20% or less of the charitable
organization’s gross income during the immediately preceding fiscal year that are used for
program services or management and general expenses of the charitable organization, as
set forth under COMAR 01.02.04.04.A and C;
(d) The Secretary of State may require an audit or review if the amount of gross
income is less than [$750,000] $1,000,000.

SENATE BILL 354 3
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.